Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245A.02, subdivision 6c, is amended to read: Subd. 6c. Foster care for adults. "Foster care for adults" means a program operating 24 hours a day that provides functionally impaired adults with food, lodging, protection, supervision, and household deleted text begin servicesdeleted text end new text begin managementnew text end in a residence, in addition to services according to the individual service plans under Minnesota Rules, part 9555.5105, subpart 18. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245A.02, subdivision 6f, is amended to read: Subd. 6f. Family adult foster care home. "Family adult foster care home" means an adult foster care home: (1) that is licensed by the Department of Human Services; (2) that is the primary residence of the license holder; and (3) in which the license holder is the primary caregivernew text begin providing the services listed in subdivision 6cnew text end .